Washington statutes.
RCW 35.38.010

Designation of depositaries.

The treasurer in all cities and towns shall annually at the end of each fiscal year, or at such other times as may be deemed necessary, designate one or more financial institutions which are qualified public depositaries as set forth by the public deposit protection commission as depositary or depositaries for the moneys required to be kept by the treasurer.

[ 1984 c 177 s 1; 1973 c 126 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 22; 1965 c 7 s 35.38.010. Prior: 1905 c 103 s 1; RRS s 5568.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 193: See notes following RCW 39.58.010.

Liability of treasurers and state treasurer, public deposits: RCW 39.58.140.

Public depositaries, deposit and investment of public funds: Chapter 39.58 RCW.